Utah statutes.
53B-24-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Accredited clinical education program" means a clinical education program for a health care profession that is accredited by the Accreditation Council on Graduate Medical Education.

(2)  "Accredited clinical training program" means a clinical training program that is accredited by an entity recognized within medical education circles as an accrediting body for medical education, advanced practice nursing education, physician assistance education, doctor of pharmacy education, or registered nursing education.

(3)  "Council" means the Medical Education Council created under Section 53B-24-302.

(4)  "Health Care Financing Administration" means the Health Care Financing Administration within the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(5)  "Health care professionals in training" means medical students and residents, advance practice nursing students, physician assistant students, doctor of pharmacy students, and registered nursing students.

(6)  "Program" means the Medical Education Program created under Section 53B-24-202.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 28, 2013 General Session

